Illinois, session 104th, SB1384.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Promotion Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 665/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 200-21)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and cited 8as the Illinois Promotion Act.9(Source: P.A. 92-38, eff. 6-28-01.)